Utah statutes.
17-36-42.   Analysis and evaluation of practices of selected counties by state auditor.

The state auditor shall also continue to analyze and evaluate the budgeting and reporting practices and experiences of selected counties and make such information available to other counties.



Amended by Chapter 73, 1983 General Session

